Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Injury to Livestock and Other Property

46-8-210 through 46-8-212.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1847, p. 250, § 4; Code 1863, § 2981; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 65, § 1; Code 1868, §§ 2982, 2983; Code 1873, §§ 3037, 3038; Code 1882, §§ 3037, 3038; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 146, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2247, 2248, 2261, 2262; Ga. L. 1901, p. 37, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2703, 2704, 2709, 2710; Code 1933, §§ 94-704, 94-705, 94-709, 94-710; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 6/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 6/SB 285 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 2006.